Utah statutes.
16-10a-1303.   Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners.
(1)  A record shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to fewer than all
the shares registered in his name only if the shareholder dissents with
respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one person and causes the
corporation to receive written notice which states the dissent and the name
and address of each person on whose behalf dissenters' rights are being
asserted.  The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection are
determined as if the shares as to which the shareholder dissents and the other
shares held of record by him were registered in the names of different
shareholders.
(2)  A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to shares held
on his behalf only if:
(a)  the beneficial shareholder causes the corporation to receive the record
shareholder's written consent to the dissent not later than the time the
beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters' rights; and
(b)  the beneficial shareholder dissents with respect to all shares of which
he is the beneficial shareholder.
(3)  The corporation may require that, when a record shareholder dissents with
respect to the shares held by any one or more beneficial shareholders, each
beneficial shareholder shall certify to the corporation that both he and the
record shareholders of all shares owned beneficially by him have asserted, or
will timely assert, dissenters' rights as to all the shares unlimited on the
ability to exercise dissenters' rights.  The certification requirement shall
be stated in the dissenters' notice given pursuant to Section 16-10a-1322.
